Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.58.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Enhanced driver's license" means a driver's license that is issued under RCW 46.20.202.

(2) "Enhanced identicard" means an identicard that is issued under RCW 46.20.202.

(3) "Identification document" means an enhanced driver's license or an enhanced identicard.

(4) "Radio frequency identification" means a technology that uses radio waves to transmit data remotely to readers.

(5) "Reader" means a scanning device that is capable of using radio waves to communicate with an identification document and read the data transmitted by the identification document.

(6) "Remotely" means that no physical contact between the identification document and a reader is necessary in order to transmit data using radio waves.

(7) "Unique personal identifier number" means a randomly assigned string of numbers or symbols issued by the department of licensing that is encoded on an identification document and is intended to be read remotely by a reader to identify the identification document that has been issued to a particular individual.

[ 2008 c 200 s 2.]